Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.88.090

Permitting prostitution.

(1) A person is guilty of permitting prostitution if, having possession or control of premises which he or she knows are being used for prostitution purposes, he or she fails without lawful excuse to make reasonable effort to halt or abate such use.

(2) Permitting prostitution is a misdemeanor.

[ 2011 c 336 s 414; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.88.090.]